Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.110

Military training or experience.

An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the secretary determines that the military training or experience is not substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

[ 2012 c 153 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.